Louisiana, session 2026, SB499.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:90(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§90. Acts prohibited on licensed premises; suspension or revocation of permits
* * *
(1) Legislative findings.
(a) On January 15, 2023, nineteen-year-old Madison Brooks lost her life
after being served alcohol underage through the use of another person's
identification.
(b) Physical and digital identification remain vulnerable to transfer and
forgery.
(c) Certified biometrically-bound age assurance credentials, which bind
a verified age twenty-one and over indicator to a one-way facial biometric
template inside a tamper-proof quick response (QR) code, provide a
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1502 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 499
low-friction, privacy-protective solution that prevents exactly this type of
tragedy. The facial biometric is mathematically one-way, cannot be
reverse-engineered into an image or usable data, and can only be matched to the
live face of the credential holder.
(2) "Certified biometrically-bound age assurance credential" means a
digital or physical credential issued by the commissioner that shall meet all of
the following criteria:
(a) Establishes or verifies an individual's age or age-eligibility in
compliance with Digital Identity Guidelines, published by the National Institute
of Standards and Technology (NIST).
(b) Is cryptographically bound to one or more biometric identifiers of the
individual so that the credential cannot be transferred, shared, or used by any
other person.
(c) Meets applicable age assurance, identity-proofing, and security
standards.
(3) Any certified biometrically-bound age assurance credential presented
in digital-wallet or printed form shall be accepted by any permittee as lawful
proof of age when the quick QR code is scanned and the live facial match
confirms the holder.
(4) No full identity data or raw biometric image shall be transmitted to
or retained by the relying party beyond the age indicator.
(5) Subject to appropriation, the commissioner shall provide approved
applicable equipment, including but not limited to computer hardware and
software necessary for permittees to confirm the certified biometrically-bound
age-assurance credential of a patron before entering the premises.
(6) The commissioner shall promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Subsection.
(7) This Subsection shall be known and may be cited as the "Madison
Brooks Law."
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1502 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 499